District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3207

Rules.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-58, § 107
as added Aug. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-137, § 5, 29 DCR 2757
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 3(i), 45 DCR 4826

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3207.

Effective Dates

Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 4-137 provided that the provisions of the act shall take effect on the first day of the first month which begins more than 30 days after August 14, 1982, or on October 1, 1982, whichever is later.